Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 352, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 13.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 13.1. Persons convicted of:
1. First degree murder as provided for in Section 701.7 of this
title;
2. Second degree murder as provided for in Section 701.8 of
this title;
3. Manslaughter in the first degree as provided for in Section
711 of this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3264 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. Poisoning with intent to kill as provided for in Section 651
of this title;
5. Shooting with intent to kill, use of a vehicle to facilitate
use of a firearm, crossbow or other weapon, assault, battery, or
assault and battery with a deadly weapon or by other means likely to
produce death or great bodily harm, as provided for in Section 652
of this title;
6. Assault with intent to kill as provided for in Section 653
of this title;
7. Conjoint robbery as provided for in Section 800 of this
title;
8. Robbery with a dangerous weapon as provided for in Section
801 of this title;
9. First degree robbery as provided for in Section 797 of this
title;
10. First degree rape as provided for in Section 1111 or 1114
of this title;
11. First degree arson as provided for in Section 1401 of this
title;
12. First degree burglary as provided for in Section 1431 of
this title;
13. Bombing as provided for in Section 1767.1 of this title;
14. Any crime against a child as provided for in Section 843.5
of this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3264 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

15. Forcible sodomy as provided for in Section 888 of this
title;
16. Child sexual abuse material or aggravated child sexual
abuse material as provided for in Section 1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.1,
1024.2, or 1040.12a of this title;
17. Child sex trafficking as defined in Section 1030 of this
title;
18. Lewd molestation of a child as provided for in Section 1123
of this title;
19. Abuse of a vulnerable adult as defined in Section 10-103 of
Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Aggravated trafficking as provided for in subsection C of
Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Aggravated assault and battery as provided for in Section
646 of this title upon any person defending another person from
assault and battery;
22. Human trafficking as defined in Section 748 of this title
or;
23. Domestic abuse by strangulation as provided for in Section
644 of this title; or
24. Discharging a firearm at or into a dwelling or building
used for public or business purposes, as provided for in Section
1289.17A of this title,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3264 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

or a ny attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation thereof, shall be
required to serve not less than eighty-five percent (85%) of any
sentence of imprisonment imposed by the judicial system prior to
becoming eligible for consideration for parole. Persons convicted
of these offenses shall not be eligible for earned credits or any
other type of credits which have the effect of reducing the length
of the sentence to less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the
sentence imposed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 22, 2026 - DO PASS














SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3264 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)